Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 2
COLORADO INFANT AND TODDLER QUALITY
AND AVAILABILITY GRANT PROGRAM

26.5-5-201. Short title.

The short title of this part 2 is the "Colorado Infant and Toddler Quality and Availability Grant Program".

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 717, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.7-101 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Colorado child care assistance program" or "CCCAP" means the Colorado child care assistance program created in part 1 of article 4 of this title 26.5.

"Colorado shines system" means the Colorado shines quality rating and improvement system established in section 26.5-5-101.

"County department" means a county or district department of human or social services.

"Early childhood council" means an early childhood council established pursuant to part 2 of article 2 of this title 26.5.

"Early childhood education program" means a child care program licensed pursuant to part 3 of this article 5 that provides child care and education to infants and toddlers living in low-income families.

"Grant program" means the Colorado infant and toddler quality and availability grant program created in section 26.5-5-203.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 717, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.7-102 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-203. Colorado infant and toddler quality and availability grant program - creation.

Subject to available appropriations, there is created in the department the Colorado infant and toddler quality and availability grant program. Grants are awarded through the Colorado shines system to improve quality in licensed infant and toddler care and increase the number of low-income infants and toddlers served through high-quality early childhood education programs, as well as promote voluntary family partnerships, as determined for the Colorado shines system. A program is considered "high quality" if it is rated in the top three levels of the state's Colorado shines system. Early childhood councils may apply for money through the department, which administers the program as part of the Colorado shines system. An early childhood education program that is within the service area of an early childhood council may apply to the early childhood council for money that would allow the program to increase the number of infants and toddlers living in low-income families served through high-quality early childhood education programs.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 717, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.7-103 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-204. Eligibility for grants - applications - deadlines.

The department shall develop an application process and issue a request for proposals for the grant program, including notification of available money to early childhood councils, eligibility criteria, proposal requirements, and award criteria.

An applicant to the grant program is eligible for a grant award pursuant to this part 2 if:

The application is made by an early childhood council and includes strategies developed jointly with community partners, including, at a minimum, county departments of human or social services. If an early childhood council serves more than one county, it may submit a single application for the counties that make up its designated service area.

The early childhood education programs to which the grant money will be distributed have achieved a quality rating pursuant to the Colorado shines system of at least a level two, or are licensed programs with a demonstrated hardship that are actively working toward achieving a Colorado shines system level two rating, and have fiscal agreements with CCCAP;

The early childhood council demonstrates a need and provides a plan to improve quality and increase the capacity for early childhood education programs that serve infants and toddlers three years of age or younger in its designated service area. The early childhood education programs may be home-based or center-based.

The applicant meets any other criteria set forth in the application process developed pursuant to this section.

Subject to available appropriations, the department shall review applications and determine which applicants will receive grants and the amount of each grant.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 718, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.7-104 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-205. Reporting requirements.

No later than August 15 each year, an early childhood council that receives a grant shall provide the department with an annual report concerning the outcomes of the grant. The report must include, at a minimum:

A summary of data received from early childhood education programs that received grant money;

The number of infants and toddlers under three years of age served because of the grant program in home-based programs and the number served in center-based programs;

The length of time services were provided;

A detailed description of quality improvements made using grant money;

A description of how the grantee's program met the stated outcomes in its application;

A summary of the number of jobs created through the grant program; and

Any other data required by the department.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before December 1, 2014, and each December 1 thereafter, the department shall provide a written report on the grant program to the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees. The report must include a summary of the data received pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the total amount of grants and grant money awarded, and the total increase in the number of infants and toddlers under three years of age served by the grant program.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 718, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.7-105 as it existed prior to 2022.